California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The bonds, or each series thereof, shall be dated and numbered consecutively and shall be signed by the chairperson or vice chairperson of the commission and the auditor-controller of the commission, and the official seal, if any, of the commission shall be attached.

The interest coupons of the bonds shall be signed by the auditor-controller of the commission. All of the signatures and seal may be printed, lithographed, or mechanically reproduced.

If any officer whose signature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be that officer before the delivery of the bonds, the officer’s signature is as effective as if the officer had remained in office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240316.

The bonds may be sold as the commission determines by resolution, and the bonds may be sold at a price below par, whether by negotiated or public sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240317.

Delivery of any bonds may be made at any place either inside or outside the state, and the purchase price may be received in cash or bank credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240318.

All accrued interest and premiums received on the sale of the bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds, and the remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the treasury of the commission and applied to secure the bonds or for the purposes for which the debt was incurred. However, when the purposes have been accomplished, any money remaining shall be either (a) transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of, and interest on, the bonds or (b) placed in a fund to be used for the purchase of the outstanding bonds in the open market at prices and in the manner, either at public or private sale or otherwise, as determined by the commission. Bonds so purchased shall be canceled immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240319.

(a) The commission may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the commission upon the terms, at the times and in the manner which it determines.

(b) Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all, or any part of, the principal of the outstanding bonds, the premiums, if any, due upon call and redemption thereof prior to maturity, all expenses of the refunding, and either of the following:

(1) The interest upon the refunding bonds from the date of sale thereof to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded out of the proceeds of the sale of the refunding bonds or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holders of the bonds.

(2) The interest upon the bonds to be refunded from the date of sale of the refunding bonds to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holder of the bonds.

(c) The provisions of this chapter for the issuance and sale of bonds apply to the issuance and sale of refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240320.

(a) The commission may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds which have been authorized pursuant to this chapter, but which have not been sold or delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor and may renew the bond anticipation notes from time to time. However, the maximum maturity of any bond anticipation notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of delivery of the original bond anticipation notes.

(b) The bond anticipation notes, and the interest thereon, may be paid from any money of the commission available therefor, including the revenues from the tax. If not previously otherwise paid, the bond anticipation notes, or any portion thereof, or the interest thereon, shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the commission in anticipation of which the notes were issued.

(c) The bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of the bonds which the commission has been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of the authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding. The bond anticipation notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds.

(d) The bond anticipation notes and the resolutions authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a resolution of the commission may contain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240321.

Any bonds issued under this chapter are legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, commercial and savings banks, and trust companies; and for state school funds; and whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state, that money or those funds may be invested in the bonds issued under this chapter, and whenever bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public money, the bonds issued under this chapter may be so used. The provisions of this chapter are in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240322.

Any action or proceeding wherein the validity of the adoption of the retail transactions and use tax ordinance provided for in this chapter or the issuance of any bonds thereunder or any of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied, shall be commenced within six months from the date of the election at which the ordinance is approved; otherwise, the bonds and all proceedings in relation thereto, including the adoption and approval of the ordinance, shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240323.

The commission has no power to impose any tax other than the transactions and use tax imposed upon approval of the voters in accordance with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

